District of Columbia statutes.
38-505

Attendance without certification.

A school shall permit a student to attend for not more than 10 days while the school does not have certification of immunization for that student. If immunization requires a series of treatments that cannot be completed within the 10 days, the student shall be permitted to attend school while the treatments are continuing if, within the 10 days, the school receives written notification from whomever is administering it that the immunization is in progress.

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-20, § 6, 26 DCR 380
1981 Ed., § 31-505.
1973 Ed., § 31-2205.